Maryland, session 2026, HB1471.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
SUBTITLE 2A. IDENTITY THEFT DEBT.
14–2A–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1471*

HOUSE BILL 1471
(B) “CONSUMER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL SUBJECT TO A DEBT.
(C) (1) “CREDITOR” MEANS A PERSON, OR THE PERSON’S SUCCESSOR,
ASSIGNEE, OR AGENT, CLAIMING TO OWN OR HAVE THE RIGHT TO COLLECT A DEBT
OWED BY A CONSUMER.
(2) “CREDITOR” INCLUDES A COLLECTOR AS DEFINED IN § 14–201 OF
THIS TITLE.
(D) “EVIDENCE” INCLUDES:
(1) A POLICE REPORT;
(2) A REPORT MADE TO A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY;
(3) A FEDERAL TRADE COMMISSION IDENTITY THEFT REPORT;
(4) A REPORT MADE TO THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL;
(5) A REPORT MADE TO THE CONSUMER PROTECTION OFFICE OF A
LOCAL GOVERNMENT;
(6) A RECORD OF A GUILTY PLEA, CONVICTION, OR PROBATION
BEFORE JUDGMENT; AND
(7) AN IDENTITY THEFT PASSPORT UNDER § 8–305 OF THE CRIMINAL
LAW ARTICLE.
(E) “IDENTITY THEFT DEBT” MEANS ANY PART OF A DEBT THAT IS
INCURRED BY SOMEONE OTHER THAN THE PERSON WHO IS AUTHORIZED TO INCUR
THE DEBT.
(F) “SUBJECT DEBT” MEANS A DEBT THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF AN
INVESTIGATION UNDER § 14–2A–02 OF THIS SUBTITLE OR A CIVIL ACTION UNDER §
14–2A–03 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
14–2A–02.
(A) (1) A CONSUMER MAY SEND WRITTEN NOTICE ALLEGING THAT DEBT
OWED BY THE CONSUMER TO A CREDITOR IS IDENTITY THEFT DEBT.
(2) WRITTEN NOTICE SENT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 1471 3
(I) 1. BE SENT BY CERTIFIED MAIL; OR
2. BE SENT BY ANY MEANS SUFFICIENT FOR SERVICE
UNDER THE MARYLAND RULES; AND
(II) INCLUDE EVIDENCE SUPPORTING THE ASSERTION THAT
THE SUBJECT DEBT IS IDENTITY THEFT DEBT.
(B) (1) ON RECEIPT OF NOTICE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION, A CREDITOR:
(I) SHALL CEASE ANY DEBT COLLECTION ACTIVITY RELATING
TO THE SUBJECT DEBT UNTIL NOT FEWER THAN 10 DAYS AFTER THE NOTICE
REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION IS SENT; AND
(II) MAY NOT SELL THE SUBJECT DEBT NOT EARLIER THAN 10
DAYS AFTER THE CREDITOR SENDS NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (F) OF
THIS SECTION.
(2) CESSATION OF DEBT COLLECTION ACTIVITY REQUIRED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) IS NOT AN ADMISSION OF GUILT, LIABILITY, OR VIABILITY
OR NONVIABILITY OF THE SUBJECT DEBT; AND
(II) DOES NOT WAIVE ANY RIGHT OR DEFENSE AVAILABLE TO
THE CONSUMER OR CREDITOR IN ANY PROCEEDING.
(C) (1) A CREDITOR SHALL CONDUCT AND CONCLUDE A REASONABLE
INVESTIGATION OF ALLEGATIONS CONTAINED IN THE WRITTEN NOTICE NOT LATER
THAN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF A NOTICE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION.
(2) AN INVESTIGATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL CONSIDER:
(I) ANY EVIDENCE PROVIDED BY THE CONSUMER; AND
(II) ANY RELEVANT EVIDENCE IN THE POSSESSION OF THE
CREDITOR.
(D) FOR ANY SUBJECT DEBT DETERMINED NOT TO BE IDENTITY THEFT
DEBT, THE CREDITOR SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 1471
(1) NOTIFY THE CONSUMER IN WRITING OF THE RESULT OF THE
INVESTIGATION AND THE REASON FOR THE CREDITOR’S CONCLUSION; AND
(2) PROVIDE THE CONSUMER WITH A COPY OF ANY RECORD OR
EVIDENCE THAT FORMED THE BASIS FOR THE CREDITOR’S CONCLUSION.
(E) FOR ANY SUBJECT DEBT THAT IS DETERMINED TO BE IDENTITY THEFT
DEBT, THE CREDITOR SHALL PERMANENTLY CEASE ANY DEBT COLLECTION
ACTIVITIES RELATING TO THE IDENTITY THEFT DEBT, INCLUDING:
(1) VOLUNTARILY DISMISSING ANY PENDING LITIGATION RELATING
TO THE IDENTITY THEFT DEBT;
(2) TERMINATING ANY AGREEMENT WITH ANY DEBT COLLECTOR
CONTRACTED TO COLLECT THE IDENTITY THEFT DEBT; AND
(3) NOTIFYING ANY CONSUMER REPORTING AGENCY THAT DEBT
PREVIOUSLY REPORTED BY THE CREDITOR WAS IDENTITY THEFT DEBT AND THAT
ANY RECORDS RELATING TO THE IDENTITY THEFT DEBT SHOULD BE DELETED OR
MODIFIED.
(F) A CREDITOR SHALL NOTIFY THE CONSUMER REGARDING THE RESULT
OF THE INVESTIGATION IN WRITING.
14–2A–03.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, A CONSUMER MAY FILE
AN ACTION IN THE CIRCUIT COURT IN THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE CONSUMER LIVES
OR WHERE THE SUBJECT DEBT WAS INCURRED, ALLEGING:
(1) THAT ALL OR PART OF THE SUBJECT DEBT IS IDENTITY THEFT
DEBT; OR
(2) THAT A CREDITOR VIOLATED A PROVISION OF § 14–2A–02 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) AN ACTION FILED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) A COPY OF THE NOTICE AND ANY EVIDENCE PROVIDED TO THE
CREDITOR UNDER § 14–2A–02 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) INFORMATION IDENTIFYING THE ACCOUNTS ASSOCIATED WITH
THE SUBJECT DEBT.

HOUSE BILL 1471 5
(C) A CONSUMER MAY DEMAND A JURY TRIAL IN AN ACTION BROUGHT
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) A CONSUMER MAY NOT FILE A COMPLAINT UNDER THIS SECTION
DURING THE 30–DAY INVESTIGATORY PERIOD UNDER § 14–2A–02(C)(1) OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(E) A CREDITOR MAY NOT COLLECT OR ATTEMPT TO COLLECT A DEBT THAT
IS SUBJECT TO A PROCEEDING UNDER THIS SECTION DURING THE PENDENCY OF
THE PROCEEDING.
14–2A–04.
(A) IN AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, A CONSUMER WHO
PROVES BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE THAT A CREDITOR VIOLATED A
PROVISION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS ENTITLED TO:
(1) DECLARATORY JUDGMENT THAT A DEBT IS IDENTITY THEFT
DEBT, IN WHOLE OR IN PART; AND
(2) AN INJUNCTION PROHIBITING A CREDITOR FROM:
(I) HOLDING OR ATTEMPTING TO HOLD THE CONSUMER
LIABLE FOR THE IDENTITY THEFT DEBT;
(II) ENFORCING OR ATTEMPTING TO ENFORCE A JUDGMENT
RELATED TO THE IDENTITY THEFT DEBT; OR
(III) ASSIGNING THE IDENTITY THEFT DEBT TO A THIRD PARTY.
(B) IF A CONSUMER PREVAILS IN AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER § 14–2A–03
OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE ALLEGED IDENTITY THEFT DEBTOR IS ENTITLED TO:
(1) DAMAGES;
(2) COURT COSTS; AND
(3) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
(C) IN AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE, IF A CONSUMER
PROVES BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE THAT A CREDITOR KNOWINGLY
FAILED TO COMPLY WITH § 14–2A–02 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE CONSUMER IS

HOUSE BILL 1471
ENTITLED TO:
(1) DOUBLE DAMAGES;
(2) COURT COSTS; AND
(3) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
14–2A–05.
IT IS AN AFFIRMATIVE DEFENSE TO A CLAIM AGAINST A CREDITOR UNDER
THIS SUBTITLE THAT THE CONSUMER:
(1) AGREED TO INCUR THE DEBT BEFORE OR AFTER IT WAS
INCURRED; OR
(2) RECEIVED THE BENEFIT OF THE DEBT WHILE KNOWING THAT IT
WAS INCURRED IN THE CONSUMER’S NAME.
14–2A–06.
THERE IS A REBUTTABLE PRESUMPTION THAT A DEBT IS IDENTITY THEFT
DEBT IF AN INDIVIDUAL IS FOUND GUILTY, PLEADS GUILTY, OR RECEIVES
PROBATION BEFORE JUDGMENT FOR A VIOLATION OF § 8–301 OF THE CRIMINAL
LAW ARTICLE THAT GAVE RISE TO THE DEBT.
14–2A–07.
ANY TIME LIMITATION ON DEBT COLLECTION SHALL BE TOLLED FOR ANY
PERIOD DURING WHICH A CREDITOR IS PROHIBITED FROM COLLECTING THE DEBT
UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
14–2A–08.
(A) A CONSUMER MAY NOT WAIVE ANY PROTECTIONS GRANTED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) NOTHING IN THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE CONSTRUED TO PREVENT A
CONSUMER FROM PURSUING ANY OTHER REMEDY PROVIDED BY LAW.
14–2A–09.
A CREDITOR MAY SEEK TO RECOVER AN IDENTITY THEFT DEBT FROM A

HOUSE BILL 1471 7
PERSON THAT CAUSED THE DEBT TO BE INCURRED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.